New York, session 2025-2026, S139.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 2354
to read as follows:
§ 2354. Bicycle delivery worker insurance personal injury liability
insurance. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "bicycle delivery contractor" means a person, corporation, part-
nership, sole proprietorship, or other entity that is operating in New
York state using a digital network to connect BEA delivery recipients to
bicycle with electric assist delivery workers;
(2) "digital network" means any third-party courier service offered or
utilized by a bicycle delivery contractor using a mobile phone app or
website that enables bicycle delivery contractor deliveries with bicycle
with electric assist delivery workers;
(3) "third-party courier service" means a website, mobile application
or other internet service that offers or arranges for the sale or deliv-
ery of retail goods, including food, and the same-day delivery or same-
day pickup of retail goods, including food, from a retail establishment
located in the state;
(4) "bicycle with electric assist delivery workers" or "BEA delivery
workers" means an individual who:
(i) receives connections to potential BEA delivery recipients and
related services from a bicycle delivery contractor; and
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD00726-04-5

S. 139--A 2
(ii) uses a bicycle with electric assist as defined in section one
hundred two-c of the vehicle and traffic law or an electric scooter as
defined in section one hundred fourteen-e of the vehicle and traffic law
to offer or provide a prearranged delivery to BEA delivery recipients
through a digital network controlled by a bicycle delivery contractor in
exchange for compensation or payment of a fee;
(5) "bicycle with electric assist delivery recipients" or "BEA deliv-
ery recipients" means a person or persons who use a bicycle delivery
contractor's digital network to connect with a BEA delivery worker who
provides delivery of food or other items to points chosen by the BEA
delivery recipient; and
(6) "bicycle delivery contractor prearranged trip" or "trip" means the
provision of delivery by a BEA delivery worker to a passenger provided
through the use of a bicycle delivery contractor's digital network:
(i) beginning when a BEA delivery worker accepts a BEA delivery recip-
ient's request for a delivery through a digital network controlled by a
bicycle delivery contractor;
(ii) continuing while the BEA delivery worker transports the requested
items on a bicycle with electric assist; and
(iii) ending when the last requested item is dropped off from the
bicycle with electric assist and marked as completed by a BEA delivery
worker on the digital network.
(b) (i) All bicycle delivery contractors must provide personal injury
liability insurance as defined in paragraph thirteen of subsection (a)
of section one thousand one hundred thirteen of this chapter to compen-
sate persons injured by a BEA delivery worker while such worker is
undergoing a trip, at no more than twenty thousand dollars per incident
involving a BEA delivery worker.
(ii) Insurance purchased through this policy will be primary over
other applicable insurance policies and shall not include no-fault
coverage.
(iii) The insurance policy must be written by an insurer licensed to
write insurance in this state or procured by a duly licensed excess line
broker pursuant to section two thousand one hundred eighteen of this
chapter.
(c) All bicycle delivery contractors must provide notice to BEA deliv-
ery workers that they provide personal injury liability insurance. A
bicycle delivery contractor must also post this notice on its website in
a prominent place and provide contact information for the department.
(d) The superintendent is authorized to promulgate such rules and
regulations to implement this section, including regulations to address
insurance coverage under this section when a BEA delivery worker uses
multiple digital networks simultaneously.
§ 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after
it shall have become a law.